Illinois, session 104th, SB2695.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Commemorative Dates Act is amended by 5adding Section 113 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 490/113 new)7    Sec. 113. Day of Healing. The tenth day of October of each 8year is designated as the Day of Healing and shall be observed 9throughout the State as a holiday for contemplation of and 10participation in activities that have a positive impact on the 11community. Notwithstanding any provision of the law to the 12contrary when the tenth day of October falls on a Saturday or a 13Sunday, neither the proceeding Friday nor the following Monday 14shall be held or considered as a paid holiday. 15    Section 10. The Election Code is amended by changing 16Section 1-6 as follows: 17    (10 ILCS 5/1-6)18    Sec. 1-6. Computing dates of various acts; Saturday, 19Sunday, and holidays. 20    (a) If the first or last day fixed by law to do any act 21required or allowed by this Code falls on a State holiday or a   SB2695- 2 -LRB104 15337 WRO 28491 b1Saturday or a Sunday, the period shall extend through the 2first business day next following the day otherwise fixed as 3the first or last day, irrespective of whether any election 4authority or local election official conducts business on the 5State holiday, Saturday, or Sunday.6    (b) For the purposes of this Section, "State holiday" 7means New Year's Day, Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr.'s Birthday, 8Lincoln's Birthday, President's Day, Casimir Pulaski's 9Birthday, Good Friday, Memorial Day, Juneteenth National 10Freedom Day, Independence Day, Labor Day, the Day of Healing, 11Columbus Day, Veterans' Day, Thanksgiving Day, Christmas Day, 12and any other day from time to time declared by the President 13of the United States or the Governor of Illinois to be a day 14during which the agencies of the State of Illinois that are 15ordinarily open to do business with the public shall be closed 16for business.17    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 18nominating papers, petitions of objection to nominating 19papers, certificates of withdrawal of candidacy, and reports 20of political committees actually received by election 21authorities and local election officials on a State holiday, a 22Saturday, or a Sunday shall not be deemed invalid or defective 23for that reason alone.24(Source: P.A. 102-14, eff. 1-1-22; 102-334, eff. 8-9-21.) 25    Section 15. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by   SB2695- 3 -LRB104 15337 WRO 28491 b1changing Section 15-45 as follows: 2    (30 ILCS 500/15-45)3    Sec. 15-45. Computation of days. The time within which any 4act provided in this Code is to be done shall be computed by 5excluding the first day and including the last, unless the 6last day is Saturday or Sunday or is a holiday, and then it 7shall also be excluded. If the day succeeding a Saturday, 8Sunday, or holiday is also a holiday, a Saturday, or a Sunday, 9then that succeeding day shall also be excluded. For the 10purposes of this Code, "holiday" means: New Year's Day; Dr. 11Martin Luther King, Jr.'s Birthday; Lincoln's Birthday; 12President's Day; Memorial Day; Juneteenth National Freedom 13Day; Independence Day; Labor Day; the Day of Healing; Columbus 14Day; Veterans' Day; Thanksgiving Day; Christmas Day; and any 15other day from time to time declared by the President of the 16United States or the Governor of Illinois to be a day during 17which the agencies of the State of Illinois that are 18ordinarily open to do business with the public shall be closed 19for business.20    Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to the 21contrary, November 3, 2020 shall be a State holiday known as 222020 General Election Day and shall be observed throughout the 23State pursuant to this amendatory Act of the 101st General 24Assembly. 25(Source: P.A. 101-642, eff. 6-16-20; 102-14, eff. 1-1-22;   SB2695- 4 -LRB104 15337 WRO 28491 b1102-334, eff. 8-9-21.) 2    Section 20. The School Code is amended by changing Section 324-2 as follows: 4    (105 ILCS 5/24-2)5    Sec. 24-2. Holidays. 6    (a) Teachers shall not be required to teach on Saturdays, 7nor, except as provided in subsection (b) of this Section, 8shall teachers, educational support personnel employees, or 9other school employees, other than noncertificated school 10employees whose presence is necessary because of an emergency 11or for the continued operation and maintenance of school 12facilities or property, be required to work on legal school 13holidays, which are January 1, New Year's Day; the third 14Monday in January, the Birthday of Dr. Martin Luther King, 15Jr.; February 12, the Birthday of President Abraham Lincoln; 16the first Monday in March (to be known as Casimir Pulaski's 17birthday); Good Friday; the day designated as Memorial Day by 18federal law; June 19, Juneteenth National Freedom Day; July 4, 19Independence Day; the first Monday in September, Labor Day; 20October 10, the Day of Healing; the second Monday in October, 21Columbus Day; November 11, Veterans' Day; the Thursday in 22November commonly called Thanksgiving Day; and December 25, 23Christmas Day. School boards may grant special holidays 24whenever in their judgment such action is advisable. No   SB2695- 5 -LRB104 15337 WRO 28491 b1deduction shall be made from the time or compensation of a 2school employee, including an educational support personnel 3employee, on account of any legal or special holiday in which 4that employee would have otherwise been scheduled to work but 5for the legal or special holiday.6    (b) A school board or other entity eligible to apply for 7waivers and modifications under Section 2-3.25g of this Code 8is authorized to hold school or schedule teachers' institutes, 9parent-teacher conferences, or staff development on the third 10Monday in January (the Birthday of Dr. Martin Luther King, 11Jr.); February 12 (the Birthday of President Abraham Lincoln); 12the first Monday in March (known as Casimir Pulaski's 13birthday); the second Monday in October (Columbus Day); and 14November 11 (Veterans' Day), provided that:15        (1) the person or persons honored by the holiday are 16    recognized through instructional activities conducted on 17    that day or, if the day is not used for student attendance, 18    on the first school day preceding or following that day; 19    and20        (2) the entity that chooses to exercise this authority 21    first holds a public hearing about the proposal. The 22    entity shall provide notice preceding the public hearing 23    to both educators and parents. The notice shall set forth 24    the time, date, and place of the hearing, describe the 25    proposal, and indicate that the entity will take testimony 26    from educators and parents about the proposal.   SB2695- 6 -LRB104 15337 WRO 28491 b1    (c) Commemorative holidays, which recognize specified 2patriotic, civic, cultural or historical persons, activities, 3or events, are regular school days. Commemorative holidays 4are: January 17 (the birthday of Muhammad Ali), January 28 (to 5be known as Christa McAuliffe Day and observed as a 6commemoration of space exploration), February 15 (the birthday 7of Susan B. Anthony), March 29 (Viet Nam War Veterans' Day), 8September 11 (September 11th Day of Remembrance), September 17 9(Constitution Day), the school day immediately preceding 10Veterans' Day (Korean War Veterans' Day), October 1 (Recycling 11Day), October 7 (Iraq and Afghanistan Veterans Remembrance 12Day), December 7 (Pearl Harbor Veterans' Day), and any day so 13appointed by the President or Governor. School boards may 14establish commemorative holidays whenever in their judgment 15such action is advisable. School boards shall include 16instruction relative to commemorated persons, activities, or 17events on the commemorative holiday or at any other time 18during the school year and at any point in the curriculum when 19such instruction may be deemed appropriate. The State Board of 20Education shall prepare and make available to school boards 21instructional materials relative to commemorated persons, 22activities, or events which may be used by school boards in 23conjunction with any instruction provided pursuant to this 24paragraph.25    (d) City of Chicago School District 299 shall observe 26March 4 of each year as a commemorative holiday. This holiday   SB2695- 7 -LRB104 15337 WRO 28491 b1shall be known as Mayors' Day which shall be a day to 2commemorate and be reminded of the past Chief Executive 3Officers of the City of Chicago, and in particular the late 4Mayor Richard J. Daley and the late Mayor Harold Washington. 5If March 4 falls on a Saturday or Sunday, Mayors' Day shall be 6observed on the following Monday.7    (e) Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to 8the contrary, November 3, 2020 shall be a State holiday known 9as 2020 General Election Day and shall be observed throughout 10the State pursuant to Public Act 101-642. All government 11offices, with the exception of election authorities, shall be 12closed unless authorized to be used as a location for election 13day services or as a polling place. 14    Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to the 15contrary, November 8, 2022 shall be a State holiday known as 162022 General Election Day and shall be observed throughout the 17State under Public Act 102-15. 18    Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to the 19contrary, November 5, 2024 shall be a State holiday known as 202024 General Election Day and shall be observed throughout 21this State pursuant to Public Act 103-467. 22(Source: P.A. 102-14, eff. 1-1-22; 102-15, eff. 6-17-21; 23102-334, eff. 8-9-21; 102-411, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 245-13-22; 103-15, eff. 7-1-23; 103-395, eff. 1-1-24; 103-467, 25eff. 8-4-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)   SB2695- 8 -LRB104 15337 WRO 28491 b1    Section 25. The Promissory Note and Bank Holiday Act is 2amended by changing Section 17 as follows: 3    (205 ILCS 630/17)  (from Ch. 17, par. 2201)4    Sec. 17. Holidays. 5    (a) The following days shall be legal holidays in the 6State of Illinois upon which day a bank may, but is not 7required to, remain closed:8    the first day of January (New Year's Day);9    the third Monday in January (observance of Martin Luther 10King, Jr.'s birthday);11    the twelfth day in February (Abraham Lincoln's birthday);12    the third Monday in February (Presidents Day);13    the first Monday in March (observance of Casimir Pulaski's 14birthday);15    the Friday preceding Easter Sunday (Good Friday);16    the last Monday of May (Memorial Day);17    the nineteenth day of June (Juneteenth National Freedom 18Day); 19    the fourth day of July (Independence Day);20    the first Monday in September (Labor Day);21    the tenth day of October (the Day of Healing); 22    the second Monday in October (Columbus Day);23    the eleventh day of November (Veterans' Day);24    the fourth Thursday in November (Thanksgiving Day);25    the twenty-fifth day in December (Christmas Day);  SB2695- 9 -LRB104 15337 WRO 28491 b1    the days upon which the general elections for members of 2the House of Representatives are held, and any day proclaimed 3by the Governor of this State as a legal holiday. From 12 4o'clock noon to 12 o'clock midnight of each Saturday shall be 5considered a half holiday. In addition to such holidays and 6half-holidays, a bank may select one day of the week to remain 7closed, as provided in subsection (b) of this Section.8    (b) Any bank doing business within this State may select 9any one day of the week to remain closed on a regular basis 10upon adoption of a resolution by the board of directors of such 11bank designating the day selected and upon filing and 12publishing a copy of such resolution as hereinafter required. 13Any such resolution shall be deemed effective for the purpose 14of this Section only when a copy thereof, certified by an 15officer having charge of the records of such bank, is filed 16with the Recorder of the county in which such bank is located 17and published once each week for 3 successive weeks in a 18newspaper of general circulation in such county. Such 19publication shall be accomplished by, and at the expense of, 20the bank, and the bank shall submit to the Commissioner of 21Banks and Real Estate such evidence of the publication as the 22Commissioner shall deem appropriate. Any such selection shall 23remain in full force and effect until a copy of the later 24resolution of the board of directors of such bank, certified 25in like manner, terminating or altering any such prior 26selection shall be filed and published in the same manner as   SB2695- 10 -LRB104 15337 WRO 28491 b1such prior resolution.2    (c) If an occasion arises when a state bank wishes to 3remain closed on a particular day, other than a day on which 4the bank has selected to remain closed on a regular basis as 5provided in this Section, such state bank may remain closed on 6such an occasion after first sending to the Commissioner a 7copy of a resolution adopted by the board of directors 8authorizing the bank to remain closed on such occasion and 9notice of the intent to remain closed on such occasion shall be 10conspicuously posted in the lobby of the main banking office 11and any branches of such bank for at least 3 weeks in advance 12of such occasion. Any day which any bank doing business within 13the State shall select to remain closed pursuant to this 14Section shall, with respect to such bank, be treated and 15considered as a Sunday.16    (d) All legal holidays, the half holidays and any day 17selected by a bank doing business within the State to remain 18closed, shall, for all purposes whatsoever, as regards the 19presenting for payment or acceptance, the maturity and 20protesting and giving of notice of the dishonor of bills of 21exchange, bank checks and promissory notes and other 22negotiable or commercial paper or instrument, be treated and 23considered as a Sunday. When any such holidays, except 24Juneteenth National Freedom Day or the Day of Healing, fall on 25Sunday, the Monday next following shall be held and considered 26such holiday. All notes, bills, drafts, checks or other   SB2695- 11 -LRB104 15337 WRO 28491 b1evidence of indebtedness, falling due or maturing on either of 2such days, shall be deemed as due or maturing upon the day 3following, and when 2 or more of these days come together, or 4immediately succeeding each other, then such instruments, 5paper or indebtedness shall be deemed as due or having matured 6on the day following the last of such days.7    (e) Any act authorized, required or permitted to be 8performed at or by or with respect to any bank doing business 9within the State on a day which it has selected to remain 10closed under this Section may be so performed on the next 11succeeding business day and no liability or loss of rights of 12any kind shall result from such delay.13    (f) Nothing in this Act shall in any manner affect the 14validity of, or render void or voidable, the payment, 15certification, or acceptance of a check or other negotiable 16instrument, or any other transaction by a bank in this State, 17because done or performed on any Saturday, Sunday, holiday, or 18any day selected by a bank to remain closed, or during any time 19other than regular banking hours; but no bank in this State, 20which by law or custom is entitled to remain open or to close 21for the whole or any part of any day selected by it to remain 22open or to close, is compelled to close, or to remain open for 23the transaction of business or to perform any of the acts or 24transactions aforesaid except at its own option.25(Source: P.A. 102-14, eff. 1-1-22; 102-334, eff. 8-9-21.)